District of Columbia statutes.
1-618.01

Standards of conduct.

(a)

Each employee, member of a board or commission, or a public official of the District government must at all times maintain a high level of ethical conduct in connection with the performance of official duties, and shall refrain from taking, ordering, or participating in any official action which would adversely affect the confidence of the public in the integrity of the District government.

(a-1)

As a matter of public policy, each employee, member of a board or commission, or a public official of the District is encouraged to report, pursuant to subchapter XV-A of this chapter, any violation of a law or rule, or the misuse of government resources, as soon as the employee, member of a board or commission, or a public official becomes aware of the violation or misuse of resources.

(a-2)

(1)

Upon commencement of employment, any person required to file pursuant to §§ 1-1162.24 and 1-1162.25 (“Filers”) shall be provided with an ethics manual and information about the Code of Conduct.

(2)

No later than 90 days after commencement of employment, Filers shall certify that they have undergone ethics training developed by the District of Columbia Board of Ethics and Government Accountability. The required training may be provided electronically, in person, or both as considered appropriate by the District of Columbia Board of Ethics and Government Accountability.

(3)

Filers shall certify on an annual basis that they have completed at least one ethics training program within the previous year.

(a-3)

Notwithstanding the penalty provisions of this chapter, any public official who knowingly violates any provision of subsection (a-2) of this section may be subject to an adverse performance action but not termination.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations governing the ethical conduct of all District employees after consultation with the District of Columbia Board of Education, the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, and recognized labor representatives of District employees, and shall require the submission by designated employees at a policy making, contract negotiating, or purchasing level of reports of financial interest in matters which may create conflicts of interest. The Mayor shall provide for the annual auditing of all reports filed under the authority of this subsection.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1801, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(y), 33 DCR 7241
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-169, § 2(b), 37 DCR 4835
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(x), 43 DCR 2978
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 3(l), 49 DCR 8140
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(c)(3), 59 DCR 1862

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01 and § 2-359.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-619.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-348.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-213, in subsec. (a-1), substituted “chapter 6 of subchapter XV-A of Title 1” for “§ 1-615.03”.
D.C. Law 19-124, in subsecs. (a) and (a-1), substituted “employee, member of a board or commission, or a public official” for “employee”; and added subsecs. (a-2) and (a-3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(c)(3) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Editor's Notes

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.